Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Subchapter 2. Outside Aid by Local Fire Departments

§ 2961.
Authorization.

Any town, city, or private volunteer fire department may, by ordinance or resolution, authorize and permit its firefighting forces and equipment to go to the aid of a person, corporation, or private volunteer fire department in another municipality, subject to any conditions and restrictions set forth in the ordinance or resolution.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 20

, § 182.

§ 2962.
Liability.

No political subdivision or private volunteer fire department whose fire fighting forces are rendering outside aid pursuant to this subchapter shall be liable on account of any act or omission on the part of such forces while so engaged, or on account of the maintenance or use of any equipment or supplies in connection therewith, nor shall any commissioner, chief, or the superior officer of a fire department, fire company, or other firefighting force acting pursuant to this subchapter be liable on account of any act or omission on the part of any of his or her subordinates while such subordinates are rendering aid pursuant to this subchapter under the command of an officer other than himself or herself.

§ 2963.
Payment.

The person, corporation, private volunteer fire department, or political subdivision that is aided pursuant to this subchapter may reimburse the political subdivision or private volunteer fire department furnishing such aid, such compensation for such services as may be agreed upon by a contract between such person, corporation, private volunteer fire department, or political subdivision and the private volunteer fire department or political subdivision furnishing such aid.

Nothing contained in this subchapter shall prevent any assisting private volunteer fire department or political subdivision from assuming all or any part of such loss, damage, expense, or other cost as a result of assistance rendered, or from loaning such equipment, or from donating such services to the receiving private volunteer fire department or political subdivision without charge or cost.

§ 2964.
Powers, duties, rights, privileges, and immunities of members.

Whenever the firefighting forces of any town, city, or private volunteer fire department are rendering aid pursuant to this subchapter, the officers and members of such firefighting forces shall have the same powers, duties, rights, privileges, and immunities as if they were performing their duties in the political subdivision in which they are normally employed.

§ 2965.
Application to other states.

The provisions of this subchapter shall apply with respect to firefighting forces and equipment of other states of the United States that render services in this State in answer to a call for assistance provided that the laws of any such state contain substantially similar provisions, as certified by the Secretary of State, with respect to firefighting forces and equipment of this State when rendering service in such other state in answer to a call for assistance.